Alaska statutes. Title 5. Amusements and Sports.
Article 1. Safety Requirements.

Sec. 05.25.010.
Safety requirements.

Except as otherwise provided by law, a boat placed on the water of the state

must be equipped with and use the sound producing devices and visual distress signals of the same number, type, and specifications as required by the United States Coast Guard;

that is equipped with a gasoline engine for electrical generation, mechanical power, or mechanical propulsion must also be equipped with the ventilation systems and backfire flame control devices of the same type and specifications as required by the United States Coast Guard; and

that is equipped with an engine for electrical generation, mechanical power, or mechanical propulsion must also be equipped with the fire extinguishers of the same number, type, and specifications as required by the United States Coast Guard.

The provisions of (a) of this section apply regardless of whether the boat is placed or operated on water of the state subject to federal jurisdiction.

During the period of time extending from sunset to sunrise and during periods of restricted visibility, a boat placed on water of the state must display lights of the same number, type, and specifications as required by the United States Coast Guard under 33 U.S.C. 1602 and 33 U.S.C. 2002.

A boat on water of the state must carry one United States Coast Guard approved Type I, Type II, or Type III personal flotation device in serviceable condition for each person on board the boat. A Type V personal flotation device may be carried in lieu of a personal flotation device required in this subsection if the Type V personal flotation device is in serviceable condition and

if the approval label on the Type V personal flotation device indicates that the device is approved for the activity in which the boat is being used, or that the device is approved as a substitute for a personal flotation device of the type required on the boat; and

for a device that contains a reference to an owner’s manual, if the Type V personal flotation device is used in accordance with the requirements in the owner’s manual.

In addition to the requirements in (d) of this section, a boat that is 16 feet or longer, other than a kayak or canoe, must carry one Type IV personal flotation device that can be thrown and that is approved by the United States Coast Guard.

A person may not use a flashing or revolving red or blue emergency light on a boat unless the boat is operated by a peace officer or emergency professional in the performance of official duties.

The operator of a boat on water of the state may not transport a person under 13 years of age on the deck of a boat or in an open boat unless the person is wearing a United States Coast Guard approved Type I, Type II, or Type III personal flotation device. A Type V personal flotation device may be worn in lieu of a personal flotation device required in this subsection if the Type V personal flotation device is in serviceable condition and

if the approval label on the Type V personal flotation device indicates that the device is approved for the activity in which the boat is being used, or that the device is approved as a substitute for a personal flotation device of the type required on the boat; and

for a device that contains a reference to an owner’s manual, if the Type V personal flotation device is used in accordance with the requirements in the owner’s manual.

The Department of Public Safety may require, by regulation, that a boat or class of boats carry additional equipment that is necessary for the safety of persons and property.

History.

(§ 4 ch 63 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 125 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 28 SLA 2000)

Delayed amendment. —

Under secs. 3 and 30,
ch. 28, SLA 2000, as amended by sec. 3,
ch. 34, SLA 2004, sec. 1,
ch. 19, SLA 2009, sec. 1,
ch. 47, SLA 2010, and sec. 3,
ch. 31, SLA 2012, effective on the occurrence of the contingency described in sec. 30(2),
ch. 28, SLA 2000 and set out in the editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter, this section will read as follows: “(a) A watercraft operated on inland water must carry and exhibit between sunset and sunrise at least one white light to show all around the horizon.

“(b) A watercraft operated on inland water must carry at least one life preserver, lifebelt, ring buoy, or other device approved by the United States Coast Guard for each person on board, so placed as to be readily accessible. A watercraft carrying passengers for hire must carry, so placed as to be readily accessible, at least one life preserver approved by the United States Coast Guard for passenger-carrying watercraft for each person on board.

“(c) A motor-driven watercraft operated for hire must carry a fire extinguisher capable of promptly and effectually extinguishing burning gasoline.

“(d) The operator of a watercraft on the water of the state may not transport a person under 13 years of age on the deck of a watercraft or in an open watercraft unless the person is wearing a United States Coast Guard approved Type I, Type II, or Type III flotation device. In this subsection, ‘personal flotation device’ does not include a life belt or life ring.”

As of May 2022, the contingency had not been met.

Collateral references. —

12 Am. Jur. 2d, Boats and Boating, § 1 et seq.

65 C.J.S., Navigable Waters, §§ 45-51

81A C.J.S., States, § 252.

Public regulation requiring mufflers or similar noise-preventing devices on motor vehicles, aircraft or boats, 49 ALR2d 1202.

Liability under unseaworthiness doctrine for failure to furnish individual safety equipment or require its use, 91 ALR2d 1019.

Liability for injuries to or death of water skiers, 8 ALR3d 675.

Liability of manufacturer or seller for injury or death caused by defect in boat, or its parts, supplies or equipment, 1 ALR4th 411.

Validity, construction, and application of state statutes and local ordinances governing personal watercraft use, 118 ALR5th 347.

Sec. 05.25.012.
Diver’s flag.

A person who is in the water using an underwater breathing device may display a diver’s flag constructed of rigidly supported material at least 12 inches by 12 inches in area of red background with a white diagonal stripe. This diver’s flag may be displayed on a boat or surface float and must extend a minimum distance of three feet from the surface of the water. The diver’s flag shall be placed at or near the point of submergence and constitutes a warning that a diver is submerged and may be within 100 feet of the flag.
A diver shall remain within 100 feet of the diver’s flag while at or near the surface.
A boat operator within sight of a diver’s flag shall proceed with caution, steering clear of the flag by a distance of 100 feet.
Outside commercial shipping lanes, boats maneuvering within a 100-foot radius of a diver’s flag shall be slowed to no-wake speeds or five miles per hour, whichever is necessary to maintain steerage in the seaway.
A diver’s flag shall be displayed only while diving operations are underway.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1980)

Sec. 05.25.020.
Use of boat with water skis and surfboards.

A person may not operate a boat on water of the state for towing a person on water skis, a surfboard, or a similar device unless

the boat is equipped with a rearview mirror in which the person being towed can be viewed; or

there is, in the boat, a person of 12 years of age or older in addition to the operator in a position to observe the progress of the person being towed.

A person may not operate a boat on water of the state to tow a person under 13 years of age on water skis, a surfboard, or a similar device unless the person being towed is wearing a United States Coast Guard approved

Type I, Type II, or Type III personal flotation device; or

Type V personal flotation device if the Type V personal flotation device is in serviceable condition and

if the approval label on the Type V personal flotation device indicates that the device is approved for the activity;

for a device that contains a reference to an owner’s manual, if the Type V personal flotation device is used in accordance with the requirements in the owner’s manual.

History.

(§ 5 ch 63 SLA 1961; am § 2 ch 125 SLA 1992; am § 4 ch 28 SLA 2000)

Delayed amendment. —

Under secs. 5 and 30,
ch. 28, SLA 2000, as amended by sec. 3,
ch. 34, SLA 2004, sec. 1,
ch. 19, SLA 2009, sec. 1,
ch. 47, SLA 2010, and sec. 3,
ch. 31, SLA 2012, effective on the occurrence of the contingency described in sec. 30(2),
ch. 28, SLA 2000 and set out in the editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter, this section will read as follows: “(a) A person may not operate a watercraft on inland water of the state for towing a person on water skis, a surfboard, or similar devices unless

“(1) the watercraft is equipped with a rearview mirror in which the person being towed can be viewed; or

“(2) there is in the watercraft a person of 12 years of age or older in addition to the operator in a position to observe the progress of the person being towed.

“(b) A person may not operate a watercraft on water of the state to tow a person under 13 years of age on water skis, a surfboard, or a similar device unless the person being towed is wearing a United States Coast Guard approved Type I, Type II, or Type III personal flotation device. In this subsection, ‘personal flotation device’ does not include a life belt or life ring.”

As of May 2022, the contingency had not been met.